Maine, session 132, LD499.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 38 MRSA §579-A is enacted to read:
§579-A. Geoengineering prohibited
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, except as provided in subsection
2, a person may not engage in, authorize or provide funding for any activity that constitutes
or involves geoengineering.
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Carbon dioxide management" means any technique designed to remove carbon
dioxide from the atmosphere.
B. "Geoengineering" means deliberate, large-scale intervention in the Earth's natural
systems for the purpose of counteracting climate change. "Geoengineering" includes,
but is not limited to, carbon dioxide management, solar radiation management,
stratospheric aerosol injection and weather modification techniques.
C. "Solar radiation management" means any technique designed to reflect a portion of
the sun's radiation back into space, including, but not limited to, stratospheric aerosol
injection.
D. "Stratospheric aerosol injection" means the release of reflective sulfate or other
aerosol particles into the stratosphere by high altitude planes or blimps, tethered
balloons, artillery or other means for the purpose of solar radiation management.
E. "Weather modification technique" means any technique designed to alter or attempt
to alter the Earth's natural weather patterns, including, but not limited to, cloud seeding.
2. Exemption; reporting. The prohibition on geoengineering in this section does not
apply to scientific research activities authorized by the department that are conducted in a
controlled environment and that do not involve weather modification techniques or the
intentional release of substances or particles into the atmosphere or the environment. As a
condition of authorizing a person to conduct any exempted activity described in this
subsection, the department shall require the person to submit an annual report to the
department describing the activity conducted, any research or findings resulting from the
activity and an assessment of the actual or potential environmental effects of the activity.
3. Enforcement; violations. The department shall enforce the prohibition in this
section. Notwithstanding section 349 or Title 17-A, section 1704, subsection 5 or any other
provision of law to the contrary, a person that violates this section commits a Class E crime
and is subject to a fine of $10,000 for each day the violation continues.